Arkansas statutes. Title 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Chapter 7 Excise Taxes
Subchapter 2

— Special Retail Tax

Effective Dates.

Acts 1951, No. 252, § 4: approved Mar. 19, 1951. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and is hereby declared by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the collection of state general revenues during the current fiscal year has diminished to such extent that the activities of certain necessary agencies of the State Government are being and will continue to be curtailed, and that only the provisions of this act will correct a situation which otherwise will deprive the citizens of this state from receiving benefits which the operation of State Government contemplates. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall take effect and be in full force from and after its passage.”

Acts 1957, No. 410, § 2: Mar. 28, 1957. Emergency clause provided: “Whereas an efficient method should be provided for the collection of 3% excise tax set forth in Act 252 of 1951 and Act 118 of 1953, (Section 48-411, Ark. Stat. Official Edition) and it being essential that such collection be sufficient to supply the funds for the proper operation of the State Government, it being necessary for the public peace, welfare, and safety, an emergency is hereby declared and this act shall be in full force and effect immediately after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2003, No. 272, § 2: Feb. 28, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the excise tax on beer levied under Arkansas Code §3-7-201(a)(3) will expire; that Arkansas Code §3-7-201(a)(3) should be extended until June 30, 2005, to ensure that low-income families may continue to receive quality early care and education, and to support the Arkansas Better Chance Program of the Department of Education; that the stream of special revenue should be continued; and that this act is immediately necessary to prevent the tax from expiring by operation of law. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act, being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2005, No. 2188, § 2: June 30, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the current retail beer tax will expire on June 30, 2005; that in order to eliminate a period of time in which the retail beer tax would not exist this act must become effective on June 30, 2005; that the citizens of Arkansas are in need of the revenues generated by the retail beer tax; and that these revenues are necessary to continue funding essential programs such as subsidized child care for low-income families, the Arkansas Better Chance Program of the Department of Education, and the Child Care Development Fund. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on June 30, 2005.”

Acts 2007, No. 869, § 2: July 1, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the current excise tax on beer expires on June 30, 2007 and that in order to maintain continuity with the state fiscal year this act must become effective on July 1, 2007. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

3-7-201. Tax imposed — Collection.

(a)(1)

There is levied a special alcoholic beverage excise tax of three percent (3%) upon all retail receipts or proceeds derived from the sale of liquor, cordials, liqueurs, specialties, and sparkling and still wines. The tax shall be and is in addition to all other taxes now imposed and cumulative to the Arkansas Gross Receipts Act of 1941, §26-52-101 et seq.

(2)

Native wine sold at retail in this state shall be subject to the special alcoholic beverage excise tax levied upon all retail receipts or proceeds derived from the sale of liquor, cordials, liqueurs, specialties, and sparkling and still wines under the provisions of this section.

(b)

It shall be the duty of every retailer in this state to collect the tax from the consumer in addition to the established retail price of beer, liquor, cordials, liqueurs, specialties, and sparkling and still wines and to file a return and remittance with the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration on or before the twentieth day of each calendar month for the preceding month.

(c)

Failure to file the return and remittance on the due date shall be cause for the secretary to enter an assessment for the return and remittance and add as a penalty ten percent (10%) of the amount of tax found to be due.

(d)

Returns shall be filed upon forms prescribed by the secretary in accordance with such rules as the secretary may promulgate hereunder.

(e)

The State Board of Education and the Division of Elementary and Secondary Education shall fully budget, fund, and expend or commit to expend the general revenue replacing the revenue derived from the previously imposed special alcoholic beverage excise tax on beer in addition to any other funding provided by law for essential programs such as subsidized child care for low-income families, the Arkansas Better Chance Program, and the Child Care and Early Childhood Education Fund Account in an amount equal to the appropriation level for the Arkansas Better Chance Program.

(f)(1)

There is levied a special alcoholic beverage excise tax of one percent (1%) upon all retail receipts or proceeds derived from the sale of beer.

(2)

The revenues derived from the excise tax on beer levied under subdivision (f)(1) of this section shall be deposited into the General Revenue Fund Account of the State Apportionment Fund to be distributed as general revenue.

History.

Acts 1951, No. 252, § 3; 1953, No. 118, § 32(D); 1985, No. 1052, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 48-411, 48-608.2; Acts 2001, No. 1841, § 1; 2003, No. 272, § 1; 2005, No. 2188, § 1; 2007, No. 869, § 1; 2011, No. 982, § 2; 2019, No. 315, § 88; 2019, No. 910, § 3335.

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment redesignated former (e)(4) as present (e)(4)(A); substituted “not extend past June 30, 2007” for “expire on June 30, 2005” in present (e)(4)(A); and added (e)(4)(B).

The 2007 amendment added (f).

The 2011 amendment deleted former (a)(3); deleted former (e) through (e)(4)(A) and redesignated former (e)(4)(B) as (e); in present (e), deleted “After June 30, 2007” at the beginning, and “replacement” following “expend the,” inserted “replacing the revenue derived from the previously imposed special alcoholic beverage excise tax on beer” and the last occurrence of “Arkansas”; and deleted “Beginning July 1, 2007” at the beginning of (f)(1).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (d).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “secretary” for “director” in (b), (c), and twice in (d); and substituted “Division of Elementary and Secondary Education” for “Department of Education” in (e).

3-7-202. Lien — Procedure for obtaining.

(a)

If the taxpayer fails to demand a hearing before the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration within twenty (20) days after an assessment of the tax due the state has been made under this subchapter or, if the taxpayer shall fail to pay the tax assessed by the secretary after a hearing and an order by the secretary establishing the tax, as hereinbefore provided, then the secretary may as soon as practicable thereafter issue to the circuit clerk of any county of the state a certificate certifying that the person therein named is indebted to the state for the tax established by the secretary to be due.

(b)

The circuit clerk shall immediately enter upon the circuit court judgment docket the name of the delinquent taxpayer, the amount certified as being due, a short name of the tax, and the date of the entry upon the judgment docket.

(c)

The entry shall have the same force and effect as an entry on the judgment docket of a judgment rendered by the circuit court of the county and shall constitute and be evidence of the state's lien upon the title to any interest in any real property of the taxpayer named in the certificate.

(d)

The entry of the certificate as a judgment shall constitute, in addition to the force and effect above described, a lien also upon all personal property of the taxpayer named therein from the time of the entry of the certificate.

(e)

The lien shall be in addition to any and all other liens existing in favor of the state to secure the payment of the unpaid tax, penalty, interest, and costs. The lien shall be paramount and superior to all other liens of whatever kind and character attaching to any of the property subsequent to the date of the entry upon judgment docket.

History.

Acts 1957, No. 410, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-411.1; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 3336.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “secretary” for “director” throughout (a).

3-7-203. Lien — Execution.

(a)

On the entry of the certificate of the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration, the circuit clerk shall issue an execution directed to the sheriff of the county, commanding him or her to levy upon and against all real and personal property of the taxpayer, which execution shall be by the clerk placed in the hands of the sheriff for levying thereon. The secretary shall thereby have all the remedies and may take all the proceedings for the collection of the tax which may be had or taken upon the recovery of a judgment at law.

(b)

The execution shall be issued and be served or executed in the same manner as now provided for the issuance and service of executions upon judgments rendered by the circuit courts of this state.

(c)

The circuit clerks and the sheriffs shall be entitled to receive the same fees now provided for by law in such matters. The fees shall be collected from the taxpayer by the sheriff in addition to the tax, penalties, and interest included in the certificate of indebtedness.

(d)

However, in the event the sheriff is unable, after diligent effort, to effect collection of the tax, interest, penalties, and costs, the secretary shall be empowered and authorized to pay such fees as are properly shown to be due to the clerk and sheriff out of the Miscellaneous Tax Refund Account.

History.

Acts 1957, No. 410, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-411.1; Acts 2019, No. 910, §§ 3337, 3338.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “secretary” for “director” in (a) twice, and in (d).

3-7-204. Alternative remedies.

Nothing in this subchapter shall preclude the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration from resorting to any other legal means of collecting taxes as may now be provided by law. The issuance of a certificate of indebtedness, the entry thereof by the clerk, and the levy of execution, as provided herein, shall not constitute an election of remedies in respect to the collection of the tax.

History.

Acts 1957, No. 410, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-411.1; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 3339.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary” for “Director”.

3-7-205. Disposition of funds.

All taxes, interest, penalties, and costs received by the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration under the provisions of this subchapter shall be general revenues and shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the State Apportionment Fund. The Treasurer of State shall allocate and transfer the revenues to the various State Treasury funds participating in general revenues in the respective proportions to each as provided by and to be used for the respective purposes set forth in the Revenue Stabilization Law, §19-5-101 et seq.

History.

Acts 1951, No. 252, § 3; 1953, No. 118, § 32(D); A.S.A. 1947, § 48-411; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 3340.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary” for “Director” in the first sentence.

Subchapter 3

— Payment by Wholesalers and Importers

Effective Dates.

Acts 1971, No. 296, § 12: July 1, 1971.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

3-7-301. Due date.

Each licensed wholesale distributor and importer of spirituous liquors shall pay the excise tax required by law on the beverages on or before the fifteenth day of the month following the calendar month in which they are first received within this state by the wholesale distributor and importer.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 296, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-423.

3-7-302. Monthly report and payment.

(a)

Each licensee responsible for the payment of excise tax shall file on or before the fifteenth day of each month a verified report on forms provided by the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration showing, for the preceding calendar month, the exact quantity of spirituous liquor:

(1)

Constituting the beginning and ending inventory for the month;

(2)

Shipped to him or her from outside this state and received by him or her in this state;

(3)

Sold or disposed of by him or her in this state;

(4)

Sold by him or her in this state to an agency of the United States Armed Forces, to which sale the excise tax is not applicable and for which the wholesaler would be entitled to credit for taxes previously paid; and

(5)

Returned to the manufacturer, to which transfer the excise tax is not applicable and for which the wholesaler would be entitled to credit for taxes previously paid.

(b)

The report on forms prescribed by the secretary shall also show the amount of excise tax payable after allowance for all proper deductions for all spirituous liquors received by him or her in this state and shall include such additional information as the secretary may require for the proper administration of this subchapter.

(c)

Payment of the excise tax levied by law in the amount disclosed by the report shall accompany the report and shall be paid to the secretary.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 296, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-424; Acts 2019, No. 910, §§ 3341, 3342.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “secretary” for “director” throughout the section.

3-7-303. Records — Penalties.

(a)

Each wholesale distributor and importer of spirituous liquors required to file a return shall keep such complete and accurate books, papers, invoices, and other records as may be necessary to substantiate the accuracy of his or her report and the amount of excise tax due and shall retain the records for not less than three (3) years, subject to the use and inspection of the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration or his or her agents.

(b)

Any person required by this subchapter to retain books, papers, invoices, and other records who fails to produce them upon demand by the secretary or his or her agent or agents of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division or its successor agency, unless the failure to produce is due to providential or other causes beyond his or her control, shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 296, §§ 3, 4; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 48-424, 48-425; Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 335; 2019, No. 910, § 3343.

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment inserted “or her” twice in (a) and (b); and, in (b), inserted “Class A” and deleted “and upon conviction shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisoned not more than thirty (30) days, or punished by both the fine and imprisonment, in the discretion of the court” from the end.

The 2019 amendment substituted “secretary” for “director” in (a) and (b).

3-7-304. Delinquent tax penalties.

(a)

If the excise tax due the State of Arkansas is not paid when due by the wholesale distributor or importer of spirituous liquors responsible therefor, there shall be added to the amount of the tax a penalty on unpaid excise tax equivalent to five percent (5%) thereof.

(b)

If the delinquency continues for more than thirty (30) days, the licensee or permittee shall be subject to the revocation or suspension of his or her permit, in addition to recovery of the taxes or penalty through his or her bond.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 296, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-427.

Cross References.

Revocation and suspension procedure generally, §§3-2-212 —3-2-217.

3-7-305. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning bonds of wholesale distributors and importers of spirituous liquors, was repealed by Acts 1991, No. 261, § 1. The section was derived from Acts 1971, No. 296, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-429.

3-7-306. Right to contract.

To strengthen enforcement of this subchapter, the wholesalers, importers, manufacturers, and suppliers to whom this subchapter is applicable shall have the right to contract with each other to provide a distribution system best adapted, under proper rules, to ensure payment of the taxes provided by law and to minimize the possibility of tax loss to this state.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 296, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-430; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 89.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations”.

3-7-307. Rules — Sales to the military.

The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration shall continue the present, and if necessary promulgate additional rules to relieve wholesale distributors and importers from the liability of paying the excise tax levied and imposed on beverages covered by this subchapter which are sold to agencies of the United States Armed Forces.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 296, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-426; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 90; 2019, No. 910, § 3344.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “Rules” in the section heading and in the section.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Secretary” for “Director”.

Subchapter 4

— Beer

Effective Dates.

Acts 1953, No. 179, § 5: approved Mar. 2, 1953. Emergency clause provided: “Whereas, a reporting method for paying excise tax on beer will reduce the cost of collecting such taxes; and, whereas, it is imperative that every possible step be taken to reduce the cost of State Government; now, therefore, this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage.”

Acts 1953, No. 373, § 5: approved Mar. 28, 1953. Emergency clause provided: “Whereas, it is necessary for the Revenue Commissioner to have full authority to collect the revenues derived from the excise tax on beer; and whereas, it is necessary for the rules and regulations required by Acts 1953, No. 179 to be promulgated by the Revenue Commissioner; now therefore, an emergency is hereby deemed to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

3-7-401. Reports and payments.

(a)

The Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division is authorized and directed to adopt and issue rules to protect the revenue of this state, prescribing a reporting method for paying and collecting the excise tax on beer.

(b)

The rules shall require the reports to be filed with the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division on or before the fifteenth day of the month following the month in which the wholesaler acquired possession of or title to the beer.

(c)

The reports required by the rules shall be in lieu of those provisions of §3-7-106 relating to the necessity to obtain transportation permits for beer.

(d)

The reporting method and payment thereunder, within the time prescribed by this section and in the manner prescribed by the director, shall constitute a compliance as to sale, purchase, import, warehousing, transporting, and handling of beer, the transportation of beer in this state, and the obtaining of a permit prior to the transportation of beer into this state pursuant to §3-7-106.

History.

Acts 1953, No. 179, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-413; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 91.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (a) and (b); and substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (c).

3-7-402. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning bonds of wholesalers, was repealed by Acts 1991, No. 261, § 1. The section was derived from Acts 1953, No. 179, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-413.

3-7-403. Penalty for noncompliance.

(a)

If any licensee or permittee fails to file a report on the fifteenth day of each month as provided in §3-7-401, the sum of five dollars ($5.00) for each day the licensee or permittee is in default shall be added to and become a part of the tax as an additional tax.

(b)

If any licensee or permittee fails to pay the excise tax within the time prescribed for payment by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board, a penalty of five percent (5%) of the amount of the excise tax due shall be added to the tax.

History.

Acts 1953, No. 179, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-414.

3-7-404. Rules.

(a)

The rules required by §3-7-401 pertaining to a reporting method for paying and collecting excise tax on beer shall be adopted and promulgated by the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration.

(b)

The rules shall be jointly enforced by both the secretary and the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board.

(c)

The Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division shall have authority to promulgate rules pertaining to the possession, transportation, or importation of beer into the State of Arkansas.

(d)

The express purpose of this section is to carry out the intention of §§3-7-401 —3-7-403 to provide authority for protecting the state against loss of revenues derived from the levy of the excise tax on beer. The secretary shall have full authority to adopt whatever rules he or she may deem necessary to this end.

History.

Acts 1953, No. 373, §§ 1-3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 48-415 — 48-417; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 92; 2019, No. 910, § 3345.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “Rules” in the section heading; and deleted “and regulations” following “rules” throughout the section.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Secretary” for “Director” in (a), (b), and (d).

Cross References.

Alcoholic Beverage Control Division, powers and duties, §3-2-205.

Subchapter 5

— Wine

Cross References.

Wine, tax rate, §3-7-104.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1969, No. 271, § 7: Mar. 18, 1969. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the alcoholic beverage laws of this state are not being adequately enforced; that there is a pressing need for additional personnel for the proper enforcement of these laws; and that only by the immediate passage of this act can the additional revenues be raised to employ the necessary additional personnel to properly enforce the alcoholic beverage laws of this state. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective from and after the passage and approval of this act.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

3-7-501. Rules generally.

(a)

The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration is authorized and directed to adopt and issue rules to protect the revenues of this state by prescribing a reporting method for paying and collecting the tax on wines.

(b)

Rules shall provide a method of tax credit for wines sold to United States military installations or returned to the manufacturer, on which excise taxes are not required.

(c)

There will be no change in the present system of reporting the tax on native Arkansas wines.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 310, §§ 2-4; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 48-432 — 48-434; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 93; 2019, No. 910, § 3346.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “Rules” in the section heading and in (a); and substituted “Rules” for “Regulations” in (b).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Secretary” for “Director” in (a).

3-7-502. Reports and payment.

The rules shall require reports to be filed with the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration on or before the fifteenth day of the month following the month in which the wholesaler or importer of wines shall obtain delivery of wines from the supplier. The tax due shall accompany this report.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 310, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-432; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 94; 2019, No. 910, § 3347.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in the first sentence.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Secretary” for “Director”.

3-7-503. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning bonds of wholesalers or importers of wine, was repealed by Acts 1991, No. 261, § 1. The section was derived from Acts 1971, No. 310, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-432.

3-7-504. Penalties for noncompliance.

(a)

If any licensee or permittee shall fail to file the report and pay the taxes required by §3-7-502 within the time provided herein, a penalty of five percent (5%) shall be added to the tax.

(b)

If the delinquency continues for more than thirty (30) days, the licensee or permittee shall be subject to the revocation or suspension of his or her permit, in addition to recovery of the taxes and penalty through his or her bond.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 310, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-435.

Cross References.

Revocation and suspension procedure generally, §§3-2-212 —3-2-217.

3-7-505. Joint enforcement.

The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration and the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division or its successor agency shall jointly enforce the provisions of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 310, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-436; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 3348.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary” for “Director”.

3-7-506. Native wines.

(a)

All producers and manufacturers of native Arkansas wine shall report monthly on all sales made in Arkansas to Arkansas wholesalers, retailers, or consumers and shall remit the gallonage tax provided by law with the report. However, wine manufactured in Arkansas for export from the state shall not be subject to the gallonage tax upon domestic wine.

(b)

It shall not be necessary for producers or manufacturers to affix a tax stamp to individual bottles or containers, but they must indicate on the manufacturer's label on each bottle or container in an appropriate manner that the gallonage tax thereon has been paid.

(c)

All such gallonage tax shall continue to be general revenues and shall be deposited into the State Treasury and shall be credited to the respective funds and used for the respective purposes provided in the Revenue Stabilization Law, §19-5-101 et seq.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 271, §§ 3, 4; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 48-420, 48-421.